test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_miizhashk_gt-norm.yaml
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkensiminaanibanan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkensiminaanibanag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkensiminaanibaning
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkensimiwaaibanan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkensimiwaaibanag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkensimiwaaibaning
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: miizhashkensiminiibanan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: miizhashkensiminiibanag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: miizhashkensiminiibaning
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkensimini***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkensimini***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkensimini***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkenhiminaanibanan
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkenhiminaanibanag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkenhiminaanibaning
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkenhimiwaaibanan
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkenhimiwaaibanag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkenhimiwaaibaning
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: miizhashkenhiminiibanan
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: miizhashkenhiminiibanag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: miizhashkenhiminiibaning
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkenhimini***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkensishinaanibanan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkensishinaanibanag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkensishinaanibaning
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkensishiwaaibanan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkensishiwaaibanag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkensishiwaaibaning
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: miizhashkensishiniibanan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: miizhashkensishiniibanag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: miizhashkensishiniibaning
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkensishini***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkensishini***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkensishini***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkenhishinaanibanan
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkenhishinaanibanag
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkenhishinaanibaning
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkenhishiwaaibanan
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkenhishiwaaibanag
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkenhishiwaaibaning
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: miizhashkenhishiniibanan
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: miizhashkenhishiniibanag
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: miizhashkenhishiniibaning
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkenhishini***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkimishinaanibanan
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkimishinaanibanag
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkimishinaanibaning
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: miizhashkimishiwaaibanan
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: miizhashkimishiwaaibanag
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: miizhashkimishiwaaibaning
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: miizhashkimishiniibanan
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: miizhashkimishiniibanag
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: miizhashkimishiniibaning
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: miizhashkimishini***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: miizhashkimishini***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: miizhashkimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nimiizhashkensimishinaaniban
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nimiizhashkensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nimiizhashkensimishiwaaiban
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nimiizhashkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nimiizhashkensimishiniiban
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nimiizhashkensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nimiizhashkenhimishinaaniban
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nimiizhashkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nimiizhashkenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nimiizhashkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nimiizhashkenhimishiniiban
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nimiizhashkenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gimiizhashkensimishinaaniban
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gimiizhashkensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gimiizhashkensimishiwaaiban
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gimiizhashkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gimiizhashkensimishiniiban
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gimiizhashkensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: gimiizhashkenhimishinaaniban
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: gimiizhashkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: gimiizhashkenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: gimiizhashkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: gimiizhashkenhimishiniiban
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: gimiizhashkenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: omiizhashkensimishinaaniban
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: omiizhashkensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: omiizhashkensimishiwaaiban
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: omiizhashkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: omiizhashkensimishiniiban
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: omiizhashkensimishini***idig, idog***
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: omiizhashkenhimishinaaniban
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: omiizhashkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: omiizhashkenhimishiwaaiban
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: omiizhashkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: omiizhashkenhimishiniiban
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: omiizhashkenhimishini***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: imiizhashkensimishinaaniban
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: imiizhashkensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: imiizhashkensimishiwaaiban
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: imiizhashkensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: imiizhashkensimishiniiban
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: imiizhashkensimishini***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: imiizhashkenhimishinaaniban
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: imiizhashkenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: imiizhashkenhimishiwaaiban
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: imiizhashkenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: imiizhashkenhimishiniiban
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: imiizhashkenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nimiizhashkensimishinaanan
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nimiizhashkensimishinaanag
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nimiizhashkensimishinaaning
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nimiizhashkensimishiwaaan
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nimiizhashkensimishiwaaag
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nimiizhashkensimishiwaaing
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nimiizhashkensimishinian
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nimiizhashkensimishiniag
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nimiizhashkensimishiniing
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nimiizhashkenhimishinaanan
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nimiizhashkenhimishinaanag
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nimiizhashkenhimishinaaning
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nimiizhashkenhimishiwaaan
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nimiizhashkenhimishiwaaag
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nimiizhashkenhimishiwaaing
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nimiizhashkenhimishinian
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nimiizhashkenhimishiniag
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nimiizhashkenhimishiniing
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: gimiizhashkensimishinaanan
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: gimiizhashkensimishinaanag
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: gimiizhashkensimishinaaning
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: gimiizhashkensimishiwaaan
